Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.114

Damages to buildings—Where based on readjustment or moving.

If damages are based upon readjustment or moving of building or buildings, the court shall order and fix the time in the judgment and decree of appropriation within which any such building must be moved or readjusted. Upon failure to comply with said order, the state may move said building upon respondent's remaining land and recover its costs and expenses incidental thereto. The state shall have a lien upon the building and the remaining land from the date of the judgment and decree of appropriation for the necessary costs and expenses of removal until the order of the court has been complied with. The amount of the lien and satisfaction thereof shall be by application and entry of a supplemental judgment in said proceedings and execution thereon.

[ 1955 c 156 s 5.]